Utah statutes.
13-28-9.   Private action.

In addition to any other remedies, a person suffering pecuniary loss because of a violation by another person of this chapter may bring an action in any court of competent jurisdiction and may recover:

(1)  the greater of $500 or twice the amount of the pecuniary loss; and

(2)  court costs and reasonable attorney's fees as determined by the court.



Enacted by Chapter 196, 1995 General Session

